Louisiana, session 2026, HB402.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:529.1(A)(introductory paragraph) and (3)(c) is hereby enacted to
read as follows:
§529.1. Sentences for second and subsequent offenses; certificate of warden or clerk
of court in the state of Louisiana as evidence
A. Any person who, after having been convicted within this state of a felony,
or who, after having been convicted under the laws of any other state or of the
United States, or any foreign government of a crime which, if committed in this state
would be a felony, thereafter commits any subsequent felony within this state, upon
conviction of said the felony, shall be punished as follows:
* * *
(3) If the third felony is such that upon a first conviction, the offender would
be punishable by imprisonment for any term less than his natural life then the
following sentences apply:
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-961 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 402
(c)(i) If the third felony and the two prior felonies are felonies defined as a
crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B), but no actual violence occurred during
the commission of these felonies, the person shall be sentenced for a determinate
term of not less than one-half of the longest possible sentence for the conviction and
not more than twice the longest possible sentence prescribed for a first conviction.
(ii) For purposes of this Subparagraph, "actual violence" means the use,
attempted use, or threatened use of physical force against the person or property of
another and involves a substantial risk that physical force against the person or
property of another may be used in the course of committing a criminal offense.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall apply retroactively to any offender who was sentenced or
adjudicated prior to June 15, 2001.